Utah statutes.
35A-5-201.   Workforce improvement plan.
(1)  The State Council on Workforce Services shall annually develop a
comprehensive workforce improvement plan as part of the State Workforce
Services Plan.
(2)  The workforce improvement plan shall contain options and strategies for:
(a) developing jobs targeted to special needs populations, as defined in
Section 35A-2-201, including clients of cash assistance and supportive
services under this title;
(b) enhancing existing workforces through training or other methods which may
include:
(i)  providing technical assistance;
(ii)  assisting an employer on site in redesigning its work organizations,
including job restructuring, training, and retraining; and
(iii)  providing employers with the most recent research and management and
human resource systems;
(c)  marketing of groups of potential employees with special skills or needs;
and
(d) consulting with public and private employers to target specific existing
or future employment needs of the state.
